Louisiana, session 2026, HB849.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:270 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§270. Interstate highway signage maintenance and reporting program
A. The purpose of this Section is to provide a comprehensive statewide
program to proactively maintain and repair interstate highway signage in order to
ensure safe transportation, honor the many individuals in whose name portions of
highways have been designated, improve the state's public image, and reduce long-
term costs to the state.
B. The maintenance and reporting program shall be designed to accomplish
the following:
(1) Enhance roadway visibility and mitigation of driver uncertainty that
contributes to accident rates with clearly maintained highway signage.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-618 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 849
(2) Implementation of a regular schedule for cleaning highway signs and
applying a protective coating to reduce the accumulation of dirt, debris, and
emissions and extend their lifespan.
(3) The creation of a method for reporting real-time documentation of
broken, bent, or missing signs with geolocation data for accurate tracking and timely
response.
(4) The submission of before and after photographs, with embedded geotags
and timestamps, of signs for which maintenance is performed to ensure
accountability and transparency in the maintenance process.
(5) Safeguard infrastructure investments and reduce the necessity for
frequent sign replacement budgeting to achieve long-term savings.
(6) Support state and local agencies by providing access to precise,
actionable reports that empower agencies responsible for highway maintenance to
efficiently prioritize repairs and replacements.
(7) Provide highway signage that reflects pride and professionalism to
promote a positive state image for residents and visitors.
C. (1) The department shall ensure that the program provides operational and
oversight requirements designed to protect both the workers performing sign
maintenance and the public traveling on interstate highways during sign
maintenance. Safety protocols for each district may be established in cooperation
with the Department of Public Safety and Corrections and may be tailored for rural
and urban areas that may require different safety and traffic procedures during sign
maintenance operations.
(2) In addition, the department shall consider the use of environmentally
responsible operating requirements, including the following:
(a) Sign cleaning methods and products that are safe for the signs as well as
the environment.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-618 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 849
(b) Sign coatings consisting of environmentally responsible ceramic sealants
which are designed to provide protection, enhance durability, and extend the lifespan
of signs, with an anticipated effectiveness of twelve months.
D. The maintenance and reporting program shall apply to the following types
of interstate signage:
(1) Regulatory signs that specify legal requirements for drivers, outlining
actions that are mandatory or prohibited, including signs that convey instructions
related to traffic flow, speed limits, lane usage, stopping, yielding, turning, parking,
and circumstances requiring special attention.
(2) Warning signs designed to inform drivers of potential hazards or
changing roadway conditions, typically featuring yellow backgrounds and diamond
shapes to ensure visibility and recognition.
(3) Guide signs that offer essential information and directions to assist
navigation, such as route markers and travel advisories.
E. The department shall work in cooperation with the Department of Culture,
Recreation and Tourism to develop and promulgate rules for the implementation of
the interstate highway signage maintenance and reporting program, consistent with
the provisions of this Section and regulations regarding signage imposed by the
United States Department of Transportation.